California statutes. Labor Code
Whenever any qualified person is deputized or appointed by the proper authority as a reserve or auxiliary sheriff or city police officer, a deputy sheriff, or a reserve police officer of a regional park district or a transit district, and is assigned specific police functions by that authority, the person is an employee of the county, city, city and county, town, or district for the purposes of this division while performing duties as a peace officer if the person is not performing services as a disaster service worker for purposes of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4351).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 892, Sec. 25.5.)
-------------------------------------------

3363.

Each member registered with the Department of Fish and Game as an active member of the reserve fish and game warden program of the department is an employee of the department for the purposes of this division, and is entitled to receive compensation from the department in accordance with the provisions thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1394.)
-------------------------------------------

3363.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 3351, 3352, and 3357, a person who performs voluntary service without pay for a public agency, as designated and authorized by the governing body of the agency or its designee, shall, upon adoption of a resolution by the governing body of the agency so declaring, be deemed to be an employee of the agency for purposes of this division while performing such service.

(b) For purposes of this section, “voluntary service without pay” shall include services performed by any person, who receives no remuneration other than meals, transportation, lodging, or reimbursement for incidental expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

3363.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 3351, 3352, and 3357, a person who performs voluntary service without pay for a private, nonprofit organization, as designated and authorized by the board of directors of the organization, shall, when the board of directors of the organization, in its sole discretion, so declares in writing and prior to the injury, be deemed an employee of the organization for purposes of this division while performing such service.

(b) For purposes of this section, “voluntary service without pay” shall include the performance of services by a parent, without remuneration in cash, when rendered to a cooperative parent participation nursery school if such service is required as a condition of participation in the organization.

(c) For purposes of this section, “voluntary service without pay” shall include the performance of services by a person who receives no remuneration other than meals, transportation, lodging, or reimbursement for incidental expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

3364.

Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 3352, a volunteer, unsalaried member of a sheriff’s reserve in any county who is not deemed an employee of the county under Section 3362.5, shall, upon the adoption of a resolution of the board of supervisors declaring that the member is deemed an employee of the county for the purposes of this division, be entitled to the workers’ compensation benefits provided by this division for any injury sustained by him or her while engaged in the performance of any active law enforcement service under the direction and control of the sheriff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 770, Sec. 5.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3364.5.

Notwithstanding Section 3351 of the Labor Code, a volunteer, unsalaried person authorized by the governing board of a school district or the county superintendent of schools to perform volunteer services for the school district or the county superintendent shall, upon the adoption of a resolution of the governing board of the school district or the county board of education so declaring, be deemed an employee of the district or the county superintendent for the purposes of this division and shall be entitled to the workmen’s compensation benefits provided by this division for any injury sustained by him while engaged in the performance of any service under the direction and control of the governing board of the school district or the county superintendent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

3364.55.

A ward of the juvenile court engaged in rehabilitative work without pay, under an assignment by order of the juvenile court to a work project on public property within the jurisdiction of any governmental entity, including the federal government, shall, upon the adoption of a resolution of the board of supervisors declaring that such ward is deemed an employee of the county for purposes of this division, be entitled to the workers’ compensation benefits provided by this division for injury sustained while in the performance of such assigned work project, provided:

(a) That such ward shall not be entitled to any temporary disability indemnity benefits.

(b) That in determining permanent disability benefits, average weekly earnings shall be taken at the minimum provided therefor in Section 4453.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

3364.6.

Notwithstanding Sections 3351 and 3352, juvenile traffic offenders pursuant to Section 564 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or juvenile probationers pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 725 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, engaged in rehabilitative work without pay, under an assignment by order of the juvenile court to a work project on public property within the jurisdiction of any governmental entity, including the federal government, shall, upon the adoption of a resolution of the board of supervisors declaring that such traffic offenders or probationers, or both such groups, shall be deemed employees of the county for purposes of this division, be entitled to the workers’ compensation benefits provided by this division for injury sustained while in the performance of such assigned work project, provided:

(a) That such traffic offender or probationer shall not be entitled to any temporary disability indemnity benefits.

(b) That in determining permanent disability benefits, average weekly earnings shall be taken at the minimum provided therefor in Section 4453.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 428.)
-------------------------------------------

3364.7.

Notwithstanding Sections 3351 and 3352, a ward of the juvenile court committed to a regional youth educational facility pursuant to Article 24.5 (commencing with Section 894), engaged in rehabilitative work without pay on public property within the jurisdiction of any governmental entity, including the federal government, shall, upon the adoption of a resolution of the board of supervisors declaring that such wards shall be deemed employees of the county for purposes of this division, be entitled to the workers’ compensation benefits provided by this division for injury sustained while in the performance of such public work project, provided:

(a) That the ward shall not be entitled to any disability indemnity benefits. 

(b) That in determining permanent disability benefits, average weekly earnings shall be taken at the minimum provided therefor in Section 4453.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1455, Sec. 4.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3365.

For the purposes of this division:

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), each person engaged in suppressing a fire pursuant to Section 4153 or 4436 of the Public Resources Code, and each person (other than an independent contractor or an employee of an independent contractor) engaged in suppressing a fire at the request of a public officer or employee charged with the duty of preventing or suppressing fires, is deemed, except when the entity is the United States or an agency thereof, to be an employee of the public entity that he is serving or assisting in the suppression of the fire, and is entitled to receive compensation from such public entity in accordance with the provisions of this division. When the entity being served is the United States or an agency thereof, the State Department of Corrections shall be deemed the employer and the cost of workers’ compensation may be considered in fixing the reimbursement paid by the United States for the service of prisoners. A person is engaged in suppressing a fire only during the period he (1) is actually fighting the fire, (2) is being transported to or from the fire, or (3) is engaged in training exercises for fire suppression.

(b) A member of the armed forces of the United States while serving under military command in suppressing a fire is not an employee of a public entity.

(c) Neither a person who contracts to furnish aircraft with pilots to a public entity for fire prevention or suppression service, nor his employees, shall be deemed to be employees of the public entity; but a person who contracts to furnish aircraft to a public entity for fire prevention or suppression service and to pilot the aircraft himself shall be deemed to be an employee of the public entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

3366.

(a) For the purposes of this division, each person engaged in the performance of active law enforcement service as part of the posse comitatus or power of the county, and each person (other than an independent contractor or an employee of an independent contractor) engaged in assisting any peace officer in active law enforcement service at the request of such peace officer, is deemed to be an employee of the public entity that he or she is serving or assisting in the enforcement of the law, and is entitled to receive compensation from the public entity in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide workers’ compensation benefits to a person who is any of the following:

(1) A law enforcement officer who is regularly employed by a local or state law enforcement agency in an adjoining state and who is deputized to work under the supervision of a California peace officer pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6 of the Penal Code.

(2) A law enforcement officer who is regularly employed by the Oregon State Police, the Nevada Department of Motor Vehicles and Public Safety, or the Arizona Department of Public Safety and who is acting as a peace officer in this state pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 830.32 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3367.

(a) For purposes of this division any person voluntarily rendering technical assistance to a public entity to prevent a fire, explosion, or other hazardous occurrence, at the request of a duly authorized fire or law enforcement officer of that public entity is deemed an employee of the public entity to whom the technical assistance was rendered, and is entitled to receive compensation benefits in accordance with the provisions of this division. Rendering technical assistance shall include the time that person is traveling to, or returning from, the location of the potentially hazardous condition for which he or she has been requested to volunteer his or her assistance.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide workers’ compensation benefits to a person who is any of the following:

(1) A law enforcement officer who is regularly employed by a local or state law enforcement agency in an adjoining state and who is deputized to work under the supervision of a California peace officer pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6 of the Penal Code.

(2) A law enforcement officer who is regularly employed by the Oregon State Police, the Nevada Department of Motor Vehicles and Public Safety, or the Arizona Department of Public Safety and who is acting as a peace officer in this state pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 830.32 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 594, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

3368.

Notwithstanding any provision of this code or the Education Code to the contrary, the school district, county superintendent of schools, or any school administered by the State Department of Education under whose supervision work experience education, cooperative vocational education, or community classrooms, as defined by regulations adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or student apprenticeship programs registered by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards for registered student apprentices, are provided, shall be considered the employer under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of persons receiving this training unless the persons during the training are being paid a cash wage or salary by a private employer. However, in the case of students being paid a cash wage or salary by a private employer in supervised work experience education or cooperative vocational education, or in the case of registered student apprentices, the school district, county superintendent of schools, or any school administered by the State Department of Education may elect to provide workers’ compensation coverage, unless the person or firm under whom the persons are receiving work experience or occupational training elects to provide workers’ compensation coverage. If the school district or other educational agency elects to provide workers’ compensation coverage for students being paid a cash wage or salary by a private employer in supervised work experience education or cooperative vocational education, it may only be for a transitional period not to exceed three months. A registered student apprentice is a registered apprentice who is (1) at least 16 years of age, (2) a full-time high school student in the 10th, 11th, or 12th grade, and (3) in an apprenticeship program for registered student apprentices registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards. An apprentice, while attending related and supplemental instruction classes, shall be considered to be in the employ of the apprentice’s employer and not subject to this section, unless the apprentice is unemployed. Whenever this work experience education, cooperative vocational education, community classroom education, or student apprenticeship program registered by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards for registered student apprentices, is under the supervision of a regional occupational center or program operated by two or more school districts pursuant to Section 52301 of the Education Code, the district of residence of the persons receiving the training shall be deemed the employer for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3369.

The inclusion of any person or groups of persons within the coverage of this division shall not cause any such person or group of persons to be within the coverage of any other statute unless any other such statute expressly so provides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 966.)
-------------------------------------------

3370.

(a) Each inmate of a state penal or correctional institution shall be entitled to the workers’ compensation benefits provided by this division for injury arising out of and in the course of assigned employment and for the death of the inmate if the injury proximately causes death, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The inmate was not injured as the result of an assault in which the inmate was the initial aggressor, or as the result of the intentional act of the inmate injuring himself or herself.

(2) The inmate shall not be entitled to any temporary disability indemnity benefits while incarcerated in a state prison.

(3) No benefits shall be paid to an inmate while he or she is incarcerated. The period of benefit payment shall instead commence upon release from incarceration. If an inmate who has been released from incarceration, and has been receiving benefits under this section, is reincarcerated in a city or county jail, or state penal or correctional institution, the benefits shall cease immediately upon the inmate’s reincarceration and shall not be paid for the duration of the reincarceration.

(4) This section shall not be construed to provide for the payment to an inmate, upon release from incarceration, of temporary disability benefits which were not paid due to the prohibition of paragraph (2).

(5) In determining temporary and permanent disability indemnity benefits for the inmate, the average weekly earnings shall be taken at not more than the minimum amount set forth in Section 4453.

(6) Where a dispute exists respecting an inmate’s rights to the workers’ compensation benefits provided herein, the inmate may file an application with the appeals board to resolve the dispute. The application may be filed at any time during the inmate’s incarceration.

(7) After release or discharge from a correctional institution, the former inmate shall have one year in which to file an original application with the appeals board, unless the time of injury is such that it would allow more time under Section 5804 of the Labor Code.

(8) The percentage of disability to total disability shall be determined as for the occupation of a laborer of like age by applying the schedule for the determination of the percentages of permanent disabilities prepared and adopted by the administrative director.

(9) This division shall be the exclusive remedy against the state for injuries occurring while engaged in assigned work or work under contract. Nothing in this division shall affect any right or remedy of an injured inmate for injuries not compensated by this division.

(b) The Department of Corrections shall present to each inmate of a state penal or correctional institution, prior to his or her first assignment to work at the institution, a printed statement of his or her rights under this division, and a description of procedures to be followed in filing for benefits under this section. The statement shall be approved by the administrative director and be posted in a conspicuous place at each place where an inmate works.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the Department of Corrections shall have medical control over treatment provided an injured inmate while incarcerated in a state prison, except, that in serious cases, the inmate is entitled, upon request, to the services of a consulting physician.

(d) Paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (a) shall also be applicable to an inmate of a state penal or correctional institution who would otherwise be entitled to receive workers’ compensation benefits based on an injury sustained prior to his or her incarceration. However, temporary and permanent disability benefits which, except for this subdivision, would otherwise be payable to an inmate during incarceration based on an injury sustained prior to incarceration shall be paid to the dependents of the inmate. If the inmate has no dependents, the temporary disability benefits which, except for this subdivision, would otherwise be payable during the inmate’s incarceration shall be paid to the State Treasury to the credit of the Uninsured Employers Fund, and the permanent disability benefits which would otherwise be payable during the inmate’s incarceration shall be held in trust for the inmate by the Department of Corrections during the period of incarceration.

For purposes of this subdivision, “dependents” means the inmate’s spouse or children, including an inmate’s former spouse due to divorce and the inmate’s children from that marriage.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, an employee who is an inmate, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 3351 who is eligible for vocational rehabilitation services as defined in Section 4635 shall only be eligible for direct placement services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 497, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3370.1.

(a) Each patient in a State Department of State Hospital facility shall be entitled to the workers’ compensation benefits provided by this division for injury arising out of and in the course of a vocational rehabilitation program work assignment, including a sheltered workshop work assignment, and for the death of the patient if the injury proximately causes death, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The patient was not injured as the result of an assault in which the patient was the initial aggressor, or as the result of the intentional act of the patient injuring themselves.

(2) The patient shall not be entitled to any temporary disability indemnity benefits while
 committed in a state hospital facility or reincarcerated in a city or county jail or state penal or correctional institution.

(3) Benefits shall not be paid to a patient while the patient is committed in a state hospital facility. The period of benefit payment shall instead commence upon release from a state hospital. If a patient who has been released from a state hospital facility, and has been receiving benefits under this section, is recommitted to a state hospital facility, a jail-based competency treatment program, an Admission, Evaluation, and Stabilization (AES) Center, or any other program considered to be a facility of the State Department of State Hospitals under Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or if the patient is reincarcerated in a city or county jail or state penal or correctional institution, the benefits shall cease immediately upon the patient’s recommitment or reincarceration and shall not be paid for the
 duration of the recommitment or reincarceration.

(4) This section shall not be construed to provide for the payment to a patient, upon release from a state hospital facility, a jail-based competency treatment program, an Admission, Evaluation, and Stabilization (AES) Center, or any other program considered to be a facility of the State Department of State Hospitals under Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or upon release from incarceration, of temporary disability benefits that were not paid due to the prohibition of paragraph (2).

(5) In determining temporary and permanent disability indemnity benefits for the patient, the average weekly earnings shall be taken at not more than the minimum amount set forth in Section 4453.

(6) If a dispute exists respecting a patient’s rights to the workers’
 compensation benefits provided herein, the patient may file an application with the workers’ compensation appeals board to resolve the dispute. The application may be filed at any time during the patient’s commitment at a state hospital facility.

(7) After release or discharge from a state hospital facility, the former patient shall have one year in which to file an original application with the workers’ compensation appeals board, unless the time of injury is such that it would allow more time under Section 5804.

(8) The percentage of disability to total disability shall be determined as for the occupation of a laborer of like age by applying the schedule for the determination of the percentages of permanent disabilities prepared and adopted by the administrative director.

(9) This division shall be the exclusive
 remedy against the state for injuries occurring while engaged in a vocational rehabilitation program. Nothing in this division shall affect any other right or remedy of an injured patient resulting from injuries not compensated by this division.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals shall present to each patient worker, prior to their first vocational rehabilitation assignment, a printed statement of their rights under this division, and a description of procedures to be followed in filing for benefits under this section. The statement shall be approved by the Director of State Hospitals or their designee and shall be posted in various conspicuous locations where patients work or reside.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the State Department of State Hospitals shall provide medical care for its patients, which may include medical services at an
 outside facility.

(d) (1) Paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (a) shall also be applicable to a patient who would otherwise be entitled to receive workers’ compensation benefits based on an injury sustained prior to their commitment to a state hospital facility. However, temporary and permanent disability benefits which, except for this subdivision, would otherwise be payable to a patient based on an injury sustained prior to commitment to a state hospital facility, a jail-based competency treatment program, an Admission, Evaluation, and Stabilization (AES) Center, or any other program considered to be a facility of the State Department of State Hospitals under Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall be paid to the dependents of the patient. If the patient has no dependents, the temporary disability benefits which, except for this subdivision, would otherwise be payable during the patient’s
 commitment shall be paid to the State Treasury to the credit of the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund, and the permanent disability benefits that would otherwise be payable during the patient’s commitment shall be held in trust for the patient by the State Department of State Hospitals during the period of commitment.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “dependents” means the patient’s spouse or children, including a patient’s former spouse due to divorce and the patient’s children from that marriage.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a patient who is an employee, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 3351, is eligible for supplemental job displacement benefits as defined in Section 4658.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 34.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3371.

If the issues are complex or if the inmate applicant requests, the Department of Corrections shall furnish a list of qualified workers’ compensation attorneys to permit the inmate applicant to choose an attorney to represent him or her before the appeals board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 497, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3371.1.

If the issues are complex or if the patient applicant requests, the State Department of State Hospitals shall furnish a list of qualified workers’ compensation attorneys to permit the patient applicant to choose an attorney to represent them before the workers’ compensation appeals board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 35.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Dependents [3501. - 3503.]

3501.

(a) A child under the age of 18 years, or a child of any age found by any trier of fact, whether contractual, administrative, regulatory, or judicial, to be physically or mentally incapacitated from earning, shall be conclusively presumed to be wholly dependent for support upon a deceased employee-parent with whom that child is living at the time of injury resulting in death of the parent or for whose maintenance the parent was legally liable at the time of injury resulting in death of the parent.

(b) A spouse to whom a deceased employee is married at the time of death shall be conclusively presumed to be wholly dependent for support upon the deceased employee if the surviving spouse
 earned thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or less in the twelve months immediately preceding the death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.   (AB 607)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.

In all other cases, questions of entire or partial dependency and questions as to who are dependents and the extent of their dependency shall be determined in accordance with the facts as they exist at the time of the injury of the employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3503.

No person is a dependent of any deceased employee unless in good faith a member of the family or household of the employee, or unless the person bears to the employee the relation of spouse, child, posthumous child, adopted child or stepchild, grandchild, father or mother, father-in-law or mother-in-law, grandfather or grandmother, brother or sister, uncle or aunt, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, or nephew or niece.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 63.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Employee Notice [3550. - 3553.]

3550.

(a) Every employer subject to the compensation provisions of this division shall post and keep posted in a conspicuous location frequented by employees, and where the notice may be easily read by employees during the hours of the workday, a notice that states the name of the current compensation insurance carrier of the employer, or when appropriate, that the employer is self-insured, and who is responsible for claims adjustment.

(b) Failure to keep any notice required by this section conspicuously posted shall constitute a misdemeanor, and shall be prima facie evidence of noninsurance.

(c) This section shall not apply with
 respect to the employment of employees as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3351.

(d) The form and content of the notice required by this section shall be prescribed by the administrative director, after consultation with the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation, and shall advise employees that all injuries should be reported to their employer. The notice shall be easily understandable. It shall be posted in both English and Spanish where there are Spanish-speaking employees. The notice shall include the following information:

(1) How to get emergency medical treatment, if needed.

(2) The kinds of events, injuries, and illnesses covered by workers’ compensation.

(3) The injured employee’s right to receive medical care.

(4) The injured employee may consult a licensed attorney to advise them of their rights under workers’ compensations laws. In most instances, attorney’s fees will be paid from an injured employee’s recovery.

(5) The rights of the employee to select and change the treating physician pursuant to the provisions of Section
 4600.

(6) The rights of the employee to receive temporary disability indemnity, permanent disability indemnity, supplemental job displacement, and death benefits, as appropriate.

(7) To whom injuries should be reported.

(8) The existence of time limits for the employer to be notified of an occupational injury.

(9) The protections against discrimination provided pursuant to Section 132a.

(10) The internet website address and contact information that employees may use to obtain further information about the workers’ compensation claims process and an injured employee’s rights and obligations,
 including the location and telephone number of the nearest information and assistance officer.

(e) Failure of an employer to provide the notice required by this section shall automatically permit the employee to be treated by their personal physician with respect to an injury occurring during that failure.

(f) The form and content of the notice required to be posted by this section shall be made available to self-insured employers and insurers by the administrative director. Insurers shall provide this notice to each of their policyholders, with advice concerning the requirements of this section and the penalties for a failure to post this notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 1870)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3551.

(a) Every employer subject to the compensation provisions of this code, except employers of employees defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3351, shall give every new employee, either at the time the employee is hired or by the end of the first pay period, written notice of the information contained in Section 3550. The content of the notice required by this section shall be prescribed by the administrative director after consultation with the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation.

(b) The notice required by this section shall be easily understandable and available in both English and Spanish. In addition to the information contained in Section 3550, the content of the notice required by this section shall include:

(1) Generally, how to obtain appropriate medical care for a job injury.

(2) The role and function of the primary treating physician.

(3) A form that the employee may use as an optional method for notifying the employer of the name of the employee’s “personal physician,” as defined by Section 4600, or “personal chiropractor,” as defined by Section 4601.

(c) The content of the notice required by this section shall be made available to employers and insurers by the administrative director. Insurers shall provide this notice to each of their policyholders, with advice concerning the requirements of this section and the penalties for a failure to provide this notice to all employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3553.

Every employer subject to the compensation provisions of this code shall give any employee who is a victim of a crime that occurred at the employee’s place of employment written notice that the employee is eligible for workers’ compensation for injuries, including psychiatric injuries, that may have resulted from the place of employment crime. The employer shall provide this notice, either personally or by first-class mail, within one working day of the place of employment crime, or within one working day of the date the employer reasonably should have known of the crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 527, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Conditions of Compensation Liability [3600. - 3605.]

3600.

(a) Liability for the compensation provided by this division, in lieu of any other liability whatsoever to any person except as otherwise specifically provided in Sections 3602, 3706, and 4558, shall, without regard to negligence, exist against an employer for any injury sustained by his or her employees arising out of and in the course of the employment and for the death of any employee if the injury proximately causes death, in those cases where the following conditions of compensation concur:

(1) Where, at the time of the injury, both the employer and the employee are subject to the compensation provisions of this division.

(2) Where, at the time of the
 injury, the employee is performing service growing out of and incidental to his or her employment and is acting within the course of his or her employment.

(3) Where the injury is proximately caused by the employment, either with or without negligence.

(4) Where the injury is not caused by the intoxication, by alcohol or the unlawful use of a controlled substance, of the injured employee. As used in this paragraph, “controlled substance” shall have the same meaning as prescribed in Section 11007 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) Where the injury is not intentionally self-inflicted.

(6) Where the employee has not willfully and deliberately caused his or her own death.

(7) Where the injury
 does not arise out of an altercation in which the injured employee is the initial physical aggressor.

(8) Where the injury is not caused by the commission of a felony, or a crime which is punishable as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17 of the Penal Code, by the injured employee, for which he or she has been convicted.

(9) Where the injury does not arise out of voluntary participation in any off-duty recreational, social, or athletic activity not constituting part of the employee’s work-related duties, except where these activities are a reasonable expectancy of, or are expressly or impliedly required by, the employment. The administrative director shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations requiring employers to post and keep posted in a conspicuous place or places a notice advising employees of the provisions of this subdivision. Failure of the employer to post
 the notice shall not constitute an expression of intent to waive the provisions of this subdivision.

(10) Except for psychiatric injuries governed by subdivision (e) of Section 3208.3, where the claim for compensation is filed after notice of termination or layoff, including voluntary layoff, and the claim is for an injury occurring prior to the time of notice of termination or layoff, no compensation shall be paid unless the employee demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that one or more of the following conditions apply:

(A) The employer has notice of the injury, as provided under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5400), prior to the notice of termination or layoff.

(B) The employee’s medical records, existing prior to the notice of termination or layoff, contain evidence of the injury.

(C) The date of injury, as specified in Section 5411, is subsequent to the date of the notice of termination or layoff, but prior to the effective date of the termination or layoff.

(D) The date of injury, as specified in Section 5412, is subsequent to the date of the notice of termination or layoff.

For purposes of this paragraph, an employee provided notice pursuant to Sections 44948.5, 44949, 44951, 44955, 72411, 87740, and 87743 of the Education Code shall be considered to have been provided a notice of termination or layoff only upon a district’s final decision not to reemploy that person.

A notice of termination or layoff that is not followed within 60 days by that termination or layoff shall not be subject to the provisions of this paragraph, and this paragraph shall not apply until receipt
 of a later notice of termination or layoff. The issuance of frequent notices of termination or layoff to an employee shall be considered a bad faith personnel action and shall make this paragraph inapplicable to the employee.

(b) Where an employee, or his or her dependents, receives the compensation provided by this division and secures a judgment for, or settlement of, civil damages pursuant to those specific exemptions to the employee’s exclusive remedy set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 3602 and Section 4558, the compensation paid under this division shall be credited against the judgment or settlement, and the employer shall be relieved from the obligation to pay further compensation to, or on behalf of, the employee or his or her dependents up to the net amount of the judgment or settlement received by the employee or his or her heirs, or that portion of the judgment as has been satisfied.
